North Dakota, session 69, HB1289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 57-02-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is
created and enacted as follows:
Fifty percent of the taxable valuation of residential property used by a property owner
for in-home care of a qualifying individual. To claim an exemption under this
subsection, the property owner claiming the exemption shall provide to the assessor,
on a form prescribed by the tax commissioner, the necessary information to
demonstrate eligibility. For purposes of the exemption:
a. "Direct relative" means a spouse, parent, grandparent, uncle, aunt, child, sibling,
niece, or nephew, whether by blood, adoption, or marriage.
b. "Qualifying individual" means the property owner's direct relative who is
physically or mentally incapable of caring for themselves due to incapacity,
advancing age, physical or mental illness, or disability, and who lives in the
residential property with the property owner for more than fifty percent of the
taxable year.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
Page No. 1 25.0646.01000